Utah statutes.
77-14-1.   Time and place of alleged offense -- Specification.
The prosecuting attorney, on timely written demand of the defendant, shall
within 10 days, or such other time as the court may allow, specify in writing
as particularly as is known to him the place, date and time of the commission
of the offense charged.
